Utah statutes.
26-39-301.   Duties of the department.
(1)  With regard to child care programs licensed under this chapter, the
department may:
(a)  make and enforce rules to implement this chapter and, as necessary to
protect qualifying children's common needs for a safe and healthy environment,
to provide for:
(i)  adequate facilities and equipment; and
(ii)  competent caregivers considering the age of the children and the type of
program offered by the licensee;
(b)  make and enforce rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter, in the following areas:
(i)  requirements for applications, the application process, and compliance
with other applicable statutes and rules;
(ii)  documentation and policies and procedures that providers shall have in
place in order to be licensed, in accordance with Subsection (1)(a);
(iii)  categories, classifications, and duration of initial and ongoing
licenses;
(iv)  changes of ownership or name, changes in licensure status, and changes
in operational status;
(v)  license expiration and renewal, contents, and posting requirements;
(vi)  procedures for inspections, complaint resolution, disciplinary actions,
and other procedural measures to encourage and assure compliance with statute
and rule; and
(vii)  guidelines necessary to assure consistency and appropriateness in the
regulation and discipline of licensees; and
(c)  set and collect licensing and other fees in accordance with Section
26-1-6.
(2)  Rules made under this chapter shall be made in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(3) (a)  The department may not regulate educational curricula, academic
methods, or the educational philosophy or approach of the provider.
(b)  The department shall allow for a broad range of educational training and
academic background in certification or qualification of child day care
directors.
(4)  In licensing and regulating child care programs, the department shall
reasonably balance the benefits and burdens of each regulation and, by rule,
provide for a range of licensure, depending upon the needs and different
levels and types of child care provided.
(5)  Notwithstanding the definition of "qualifying child" in Section
26-39-102, the department shall count children through age 12 and children
with disabilities through age 18 toward the minimum square footage requirement
for indoor and outdoor areas, including the child of:
(a)  a licensed residential child care provider; or
(b)  an owner or employee of a licensed child care center.
(6)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a)(i), the department may not exclude
floor space used for furniture, fixtures, or equipment from the minimum square
footage requirement for indoor and outdoor areas if the furniture, fixture, or
equipment is used:
(a)  by qualifying children;
(b)  for the care of qualifying children; or
(c)  to store classroom materials.
(7) (a)  A child care center constructed prior to January 1, 2004, and
licensed and operated as a child care center continuously since January 1,
2004, is exempt from the department's group size restrictions, if the child to
caregiver ratios are maintained, and adequate square footage is maintained for
specific classrooms.
(b)  An exemption granted under Subsection (7)(a) is transferrable to
subsequent licensed operators at the center if a licensed child care center is
continuously maintained at the center.
(8)  The department shall develop, by rule, a five-year phased-in compliance
schedule for playground equipment safety standards.
(9)  Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted to grant a municipality or
county the authority to license or certify a child care program.
